Utah statutes.
17C-1-407.   Limitations on tax increment.

(1) (a)  If the development of retail sales of goods is the primary objective of an urban renewal project area, tax increment from the urban renewal project area may not be paid to or used by an agency unless a finding of blight is made under Chapter 2,  Part 3, Blight Determination in Urban Renewal Project Areas.

(b)  Development of retail sales of goods does not disqualify an agency from receiving tax increment.

(c)  After July 1, 2005, an agency may not be paid or use tax increment generated from the value of property within an economic development project area that is attributable to the development of retail sales of goods, unless the tax increment was previously pledged to pay for bonds or other contractual obligations of the agency.

(2) (a)  An agency may not be paid any portion of a taxing entity's taxes resulting from an increase in the taxing entity's tax rate that occurs after the taxing entity committee approves the project area budget unless, at the time the taxing entity committee approves the project area budget, the taxing entity committee approves payment of those increased taxes to the agency.

(b)  If the taxing entity committee does not approve of payment of the increased taxes to the agency under Subsection (2)(a), the county shall distribute to the taxing entity the taxes attributable to the tax rate increase in the same manner as other property taxes.

(3)  Except as the taxing entity committee otherwise agrees, an agency may not receive tax increment under an urban renewal or economic development project area budget adopted on or after March 30, 2009:

(a)  that exceeds the percentage of tax increment or cumulative dollar amount of tax increment specified in the project area budget; or

(b)  for more tax years than specified in the project area budget.



Amended by Chapter 387, 2009 General Session

